Utah statutes.
13-22-18.   Local ordinance.

This chapter does not prohibit any political subdivision of the state from enacting any ordinance regulating the solicitation of contributions within the subdivision's boundaries so long as the ordinance only coordinates enforcement of this chapter with the division.

